src/morphology/stems/interjections.lexc
LEXICON Interjection
eh ij ;
eeh ij ;
eee ij ;
jah ij ;
ah ij ;
ei ij ;
mhm ij ;
æh ij ;
hm ij ;
mmm ij ;
ooog ij ;
jaha ij ;
eeem ij ;
okei ij ;
em ij ;
mm ij ;
deee ij ;
aaah ij ;
jaaa ij ;
uuu ij ;
eeeh ij ;
uff ij ;
ptro ij ;
oi ij ;
oi-oi ij ;
ko-ko ij ;


LEXICON ij
 +Interj: # ;
